cs: Typ výstupního konektoru tlakového čističe: 1/4" NPT; 1/4" rychlospojka; 3/8" NPT; Rychlospojka 3/8 palce; Bajonet; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Rychlospojka (univerzální); Jiné
fi: Painepesurin ulostuloliittimen tyyppi: 1/4 tuuman NPT; 1/4 tuuman pikaliitin; 3/8 tuuman NPT; 3/8 tuuman pikaliitin; Bajonetti; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Pikaliitäntä (yleismalli); Muu
nl: Type connector voor hogedrukreiniger: 1/4 inch NPT; 1/4 inch snelkoppeling; 3/8 inch NPT; 3/8 inch snelkoppeling; Bajonet; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Snelkoppeling (universeel); Overig
tr: Basınçlı yıkama makinesi çıkış bağlantı tipi: 1/4 inç NPT; 1/4 inç hızlı bağlantı; 3/8 inç NPT; 3/8 inç hızlı bağlantı; Bayonet; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Hızlı bağlantı (evrensel); Diğer
fr: Type de raccord de sortie pour nettoyeur haute pression: 1/4 pouce NPT; Raccord rapide 1/4 pouce; 3/8 pouce NPT; Raccord rapide 3/8 pouce; Baïonnette; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Connexion rapide (universelle); Autre
pl: Typ złącza wyjściowego myjki ciśnieniowej: 1/4 cala NPT; Szybkozłącze 1/4 cala; 3/8 cala NPT; Szybkozłącze 3/8 cala; Bagnetowe; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Szybkozłącze (uniwersalne); Inne
zh-CN: 高压清洗机出水口连接器类型: 1/4 英寸 NPT; 1/4 英寸快插; 3/8 英寸 NPT; 3/8 英寸快插; 卡销; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; 快接（通用）; 其他
ja: 高圧洗浄機出口コネクターのタイプ: 1/4インチNPT; 1/4インチクイックコネクト; 3/8インチNPT; 3/8インチクイックコネクト; バヨネット; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; クイックコネクト（ユニバーサル）; その他
ko: 고압 세척기 출구 커넥터 유형: 1/4인치 NPT; 1/4인치 퀵 커넥트; 3/8인치 NPT; 3/8인치 퀵 커넥트; 총검; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; 퀵 커넥트(범용); 기타
ru: Тип выходного разъема мойки высокого давления: 1/4 дюйма NPT; Быстроразъемное соединение 1/4 дюйма; 3/8 дюйма NPT; Быстроразъемное соединение 3/8 дюйма; Байонетное соединение; G1/4; М22-14; М22-15; Быстроразъемное соединение (универсальное); Другое
ro-RO: Tip de conector de ieșire pentru spălătoare cu presiune: 6,35 mm NPT; Conexiune rapidă de 1/4 inch; 9,525 mm NPT; Conexiune rapidă de 3/8 inch; Baionetă; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Conexiune rapidă (universală); Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta izhodnega priključka za visokotlačni čistilnik: 1/4-palčni NPT; 1/4-palčni hitri priključek; 3/8-palčni NPT; 3/8-palčni hitri priključek; Bajonet; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Hitri priključek (univerzalni); Druga
hu: Magasnyomású mosó kimenetének összekötő típusa: 1/4 hüvelykes NPT; 1/4 hüvelykes gyorscsatlakozó; 3/8 hüvelykes NPT; 3/8 hüvelykes gyorscsatlakozó; Bajonettzáras; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Gyorscsatlakozó (univerzális); Egyéb
nb: Type tilkobling for utløp for høytrykksspyler: 1/4 tomme NPT; 1/4 tommers hurtigkobling; 3/8 tomme NPT; 3/8 tommers hurtigkobling; Bajonett; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Hurtigkobling (universal); Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta izlaznog konektora za tlačni čistač: 1/4 inča NPT; 1/4 inča brza veza; 3/8 inča NPT; Brzi spoj od 3/8 inča; Bajonet; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Brzi priključak (univerzalni); Ostalo
sk-SK: Typ výstupného konektora tlakového čističa: 1/4 palca NPT; 1/4-palcové rýchlospojky; 3/8 palca NPT; 3/8 palcové rýchlospojky; Bajonet; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Rýchlospojka (univerzálna); Iné
pt-BR: Tipo de conector de saída para lavadora de alta pressão: 1/4 polegada NPT; Conexão rápida de 1/4 de polegada; 3/8 polegada NPT; Conexão rápida de 3/8 de polegada; Baioneta; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Conexão rápida (universal); Outro
vi: Loại đầu nối đầu ra máy rửa áp lực: NPT 1/4 inch; Đầu nối nhanh 1/4 inch; NPT 3/8 inch; Đầu nối nhanh 3/8 inch; Ngạnh; Ren G1/4; Ren M22-14; Ren M22-15; Đầu nối nhanh (đa năng); Khác
sv: Typ av anslutning för högtryckstvättens utlopp: 1/4 tums NPT; 1/4 tums snabbkoppling; 3/8 tums NPT; 3/8 tums snabbkoppling; Bajonett; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Snabbkoppling (universell); Övrigt
de: Anschlusstyp für Hochdruckreinigerauslass: 1/4″ NPT; 1/4-Zoll-Schnellanschluss; 3/8″ NPT; 3/8-Zoll-Schnellanschluss; Bajonett; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Schnellanschluss (universell); Sonstiges
da: Højtryksrensers udgangstilslutning: 1/4 tommer NPT; 1/4 tommer hurtigkobling; 3/8 tommer NPT; 3/8 tommer hurtigkobling; Bayonet; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Hurtigforbindelse (universel); Andet
zh-TW: 高壓清洗機出水口連接器類型: 1/4 英吋 NPT; 1/4 英吋快速連接; 3/8 英吋 NPT; 3/8 英吋快速連接; 卡口式; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; 快速連接 (通用); 其他
th: ประเภทตัวเชื่อมต่อช่องจ่ายน้ำของเครื่องฉีดน้ำแรงดันสูง: 1/4 นิ้ว NPT; ข้อต่อแบบเร็วขนาด 1/4 นิ้ว; 3/8 นิ้ว NPT; ข้อต่อแบบเร็วขนาด 3/8 นิ้ว; แบบสลัก; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; ขั้วต่อแบบเร็ว (สากล); อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de conector de saída para lavadora de alta pressão: 1/4 polegada NPT; Ligação rápida de 1/4 de polegada; 3/8 polegada NPT; Ligação rápida de 3/8 de polegada; Baioneta; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Ligação rápida (universal); Outro
bg-BG: Тип конектор за изход на водоструйка: 1/4 инча NPT; 1/4 инча бърза връзка; 3/8 инча NPT; 3/8–инчово бърза връзка; Байонет; G1/4; M22-14; М22–15; Бърза връзка (универсално); Друго
es: Tipo de conector de salida de la hidrolavadora: 1/4 pulgada NPT; Conexión rápida de 1/4 de pulgada; 3/8 pulgada NPT; Conexión rápida de 3/8 de pulgadas; Bayoneta; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Conexión rápida (universal); Otros
en: Pressure washer outlet connector type: 1/4 inch NPT; 1/4 inch quick connect; 3/8 inch NPT; 3/8 inch quick connect; Bayonet; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Quick connect (universal); Other
it: Tipo di connettore di uscita dell'idropulitrice: NPT da 1/4 pollice; Attacco rapido da 1/4 di pollice; NPT da 3/8 pollice; Attacco rapido da 3/8 di pollice; A baionetta; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Connessione rapida (universale); Altro
el: Τύπος συνδέσμου εξόδου πλυστικού υψηλής πίεσης: NPT 1/4"; Γρήγορη σύνδεση 1/4 ίντσας; NPT 3/8"; Γρήγορη σύνδεση 3/8 ίντσας; Μπαγιονέτ; G1/4; Μ22-14; M22-15; Γρήγορη σύνδεση (universal); Άλλο
lt-LT: Aukšto slėgio plovyklos išėjimo jungties tipas: 1/4 colio NPT; 1/4 colio greito sujungimo jungtis; 3/8 colių NPT; 3/8 colio greito sujungimo jungtis; Kaištinė jungtis; G1/4; M22-14; M22-15; Greitas sujungimas (universalus); Kita